Hawaii statutes.
§90-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

The term "agency" means any state
agency within the executive, legislative, and judicial branches, the office of
Hawaiian affairs, and any agency within the executive and legislative branches
of the several counties.

"Material donor" means any person who
of the person's own free will provides funds or materials to an agency.

"Occasional-service volunteer" means
any person who offers to provide a one-time, on call or single task service to
an agency without receipt of any compensation, except as provided in this
chapter.

The term "person" means any
individual or organization.

"Regular-service volunteer" means any
person engaged in specific voluntary service activities on an on-going or
continuous basis to an agency without receipt of any compensation, except as
provided in this chapter.

"Stipended volunteer" means any
person who by receiving a support allowance is then able to provide voluntary
service to an agency. The allowance may be for food, lodging, or other
personal living expenses and does not reflect compensation for work performed.

The term "volunteer" means any person
who of the person's own free will provides goods or services to an agency with
no monetary or material gain and includes material donors, occasional-service,
regular-service, and stipended volunteers. Without limiting the generality of
the foregoing, the term "volunteer" specifically includes any health
care provider accepted in writing by the department of health as a
"volunteer" who provides free medical or dental treatment, diagnosis,
or advice to indigent and medically underserved patients, whether acting
individually or in cooperation with a nonprofit organization. [L 1978, c 10, pt
of §2; am L 1982, c 137, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1994, c 250, §1; am L 1998, c
295, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next